California statutes. Penal Code
(j) A defendant or person accused or convicted of a crime against the victim shall have no standing to object to a failure to comply with this section. The failure to provide a right or notice to a sexual assault victim under this section may not be used by a defendant to seek to have the
 conviction or sentence set aside.

(k) The sole civil or criminal remedy available to a sexual assault victim for a law enforcement agency’s failure to fulfill its responsibilities under this section is standing to file a writ of mandamus to require compliance with subdivision (e) or (f).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 783, Sec. 1.   (SB 733)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

680.1.

The Department of Justice, on or before July 1, 2022, and in consultation with law enforcement agencies and crime victims groups, shall establish a process that allows a survivor of sexual assault to track and receive updates privately, securely, and electronically regarding the status, location, and information regarding their sexual assault evidence kit in the department’s SAFE-T database.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 634, Sec. 1.   (SB 215)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

680.2.

(a) Upon the initial interaction with a sexual assault victim, a law enforcement officer or medical provider shall provide the victim with a card to be developed by every local law enforcement agency, in consultation with sexual assault experts, that explains all of the rights of sexual assault victims in clear language that is comprehensible to a person proficient in English at the fifth grade level, in at least 12-point font, and available in all major languages of the state. This card shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) A clear statement that a sexual assault victim is not required to participate in the criminal justice system or to receive a medical evidentiary
 or physical examination in order to retain
 their rights under law.

(2) A clear statement that, under Section 1219 of the Code of Civil Procedure, a court may not imprison or otherwise confine or place in custody a victim of sexual assault or domestic violence for contempt if the contempt consists of refusing to testify concerning the crime. 

(3) Telephone or internet website contact information for a nearby rape crisis center and sexual assault counselor.

(4) Information about the types of law enforcement protection available to the sexual assault victim, including a temporary protection order, and the process to obtain that protection.

(5) Instructions for requesting the results of the
 analysis of the victim’s sexual assault forensic evidence.

(6) Information about state and federal compensation funds for medical and other costs associated with the sexual assault and information on any municipal, state, or federal right to restitution for sexual assault victims if a criminal trial occurs.

(7) A clear statement that the victim has the right to have a sexual assault counselor and at least one other support person of the victim’s choosing present at any initial medical evidentiary examination, physical examination, or investigative interview arising out of a sexual assault, and that a sexual assault counselor can be contacted 24 hours a day.

(8) Information about the rate of potential evidence
 degradation.

(9) A clear statement that if sexual assault forensic evidence will be tested, it should be transported to the crime laboratory and analyzed within the time limits imposed by subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 803.

(10) A clear statement that the law enforcement agency or crime laboratory will retain the sexual assault forensic evidence for at least 20 years, or if the victim was under 18 years of age at the time of the alleged offense, at least until the victim’s 40th birthday.

(b) A law enforcement official shall, upon written request by a sexual assault victim, furnish a free copy of the initial crime report related to the sexual assault, regardless of whether the report has been
 closed by the law enforcement agency, to the victim. A law enforcement agency may redact personal, identifying information in the copy furnished to the victim.

(c) A prosecutor shall, pursuant to Section 290.46, upon written request by a sexual assault victim, provide the convicted defendant’s information on a sex offender registry to the victim, if the defendant is required to register as a sex offender.

(d) The law enforcement agency shall provide sufficient copies of the card described in subdivision (a) to each provider in its jurisdiction of medical evidentiary examinations or physical examinations arising out of sexual assault.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 709, Sec. 2.   (SB 916)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

680.3.

(a) Each law enforcement agency that has investigated a case involving the collection of sexual assault kit evidence from a victim shall, within 120 days of collection, create an information record for the kit on the Department of Justice’s SAFE-T database and report the following:

(1) If biological evidence samples from the kit were submitted to a DNA laboratory for analysis.

(2) If the kit
 generated a probative DNA profile.

(3) If evidence was not submitted to a DNA laboratory for processing, the reason or reasons for not submitting evidence from the kit to a DNA laboratory for processing.

(b) After 120 days following submission of sexual assault kit biological evidence for processing, if a public DNA laboratory has not conducted DNA testing, that laboratory shall provide the reasons for the status in the appropriate SAFE-T data field. If the investigating law enforcement agency has contracted with a private vendor laboratory to conduct DNA testing on
 kit evidence, the submitting law enforcement agency shall provide the 120-day update in SAFE-T. The process described in this subdivision shall take place every 120 days until DNA testing is complete, except as provided in subdivision (c).

(c) (1) Upon expiration of a sexual assault case’s statute of limitations, or if a law enforcement agency elects not to analyze the DNA or intends to destroy or dispose of the crime scene evidence pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 680, the investigating law enforcement agency shall state in writing the reason the kit collected as part of that case’s investigation
 was not analyzed. This written statement relieves the investigating law enforcement agency or public laboratory of any further duty to report information related to that kit pursuant to this section.

(2) A record of a kit collected prior to January 1, 2016, that is created in SAFE-T pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 680.4 is excluded from the 120-day update requirement.

(d) The SAFE-T database shall not contain any identifying information about a victim or a suspect, shall not contain any DNA profiles, and shall not contain any information that would impair a pending criminal investigation.

(e) The SAFE-T database shall, on or before July 1, 2022, allow a survivor of sexual assault to track and receive
 updates privately, securely, and electronically regarding the status and location of the survivor’s sexual assault evidence kit, as provided in Section 680.1.

(f) On an annual basis, the Department of Justice shall file a report to the Legislature in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code summarizing data entered into the SAFE-T database during that year. The report shall not reference individual victims, suspects, investigations, or prosecutions. The report shall be made public by the department.

(g) Except as provided in subdivision (e), in order to protect the confidentiality of the SAFE-T database information, SAFE-T database contents shall be confidential, and a participating law enforcement agency or laboratory shall not be compelled in a criminal or civil proceeding, except as required by Brady v. Maryland (1963) 373 U.S. 83, to provide any SAFE-T database
 contents to a person or party seeking those records or information.

(h) The requirements of this section shall only apply to sexual assault
 kit evidence from a victim collected on or after January 1, 2018, and to sexual assault kit evidence from a victim required to be entered into the SAFE-T database pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 680.4.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 715, Sec. 2.   (SB 464)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

680.4.

(a) Each law enforcement agency, medical facility, public crime laboratory, and any other entity that receives, maintains, stores, or preserves sexual assault evidence kits shall participate in an audit of all untested sexual assault kits in their
 possession pursuant to this section.

(b) No later than July 1, 2026, each law enforcement agency and public crime laboratory subject to subdivision (a) shall create a record in the SAFE-T database, pursuant to Section 680.3, for every victim sexual assault kit in their possession that has not had DNA testing completed as of July 1, 2026.

(1) If a medical facility submitted selected evidence samples directly to a crime laboratory under a rapid turnaround DNA program, and those samples have been taken through the DNA testing process, the entire sexual assault kit shall be considered tested for the purposes of this section.

(2) A kit that has only undergone biological screening shall not be considered tested for the purposes of this section. A tested kit is one that has been taken, at minimum, through the DNA quantitation process, and either of the
 following:

(A) If the DNA quantitation results indicate that there is no DNA foreign to the victim, or the foreign DNA is of insufficient quality and quantity for DNA typing to provide genetic information about an alleged perpetrator, analysis can stop at DNA quantitation, and the kit shall be considered tested for the purposes of this section.

(B) If the DNA quantitation results indicate that DNA typing may provide genetic information about an alleged perpetrator, and the DNA is of sufficient quantity and quality to be successfully typed, the analysis shall continue through DNA typing for the kit to be considered tested for the purposes of this section.

(3) The SAFE-T database shall only contain records for sexual assault evidence kits collected from victims. Sexual assault evidence kits collected from suspects
 shall also be subject to the audit pursuant to this section, but they shall not be entered into the SAFE-T database. The following information shall be reported separately by each entity in a format prescribed by the Department of Justice:

(A) The total number of untested suspect sexual assault kits in their possession.

(B) For each suspect kit, the following information:

(i) The date the suspect kit was collected.

(ii) The date the suspect kit was picked up by a law enforcement agency, for each law enforcement agency that has taken custody of the kit.

(iii) The date the suspect kit was delivered to a crime laboratory.

(iv) The reason the suspect kit has not been tested, if applicable.

(4) Sexual assault evidence other than evidence collected in kits, including clothing and bedding, DNA reference samples collected from suspects and consensual partners, and kits collected under circumstances where no sexual assault is alleged or suspected to have occurred, are not subject to this audit and shall not be entered into the SAFE-T database or reported for this audit.

(c) No later than July 1, 2026, each medical facility and other non-law enforcement entity subject to subdivision (a) shall report to the Department of Justice, in the format prescribed by the department, all of the following:

(1) The total number of untested sexual assault kits in their possession that were not submitted to a law enforcement agency or public
 crime laboratory because the victim chose not to report the assault to law enforcement at the time of collection, and had not chosen to report the assault to law enforcement by the time of the audit.

(2) For untested sexual assault evidence kits in their possession where the victim chose to report the assault to law enforcement:

(A) The total number of untested sexual assault kits in their possession.

(B) For each kit, the following information:

(i) The date the kit was collected.

(ii) The name of the medical facility, law enforcement agency, public crime laboratory, or other entity from which the kit was received.

(iii) The
 date the kit was received by the entity.

(iv) The reason the kit has not been submitted to a law enforcement agency or public crime laboratory.

(C) This reporting requirement does not apply to untested kits that have been recently collected and are temporarily being stored pending release to a law enforcement agency or public crime laboratory.

(d) The Department of Justice shall, by no later than July 1, 2027, prepare and submit a report to the Legislature summarizing the information received
 pursuant to
 subdivisions (b) and (c).

(e) The report required by subdivision (d) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 715, Sec. 4.   (SB 464)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

PART 2. OF CRIMINAL PROCEDURE [681. - 1620.]



PRELIMINARY PROVISIONS

681.

No person can be punished for a public offense, except upon a legal conviction in a Court having jurisdiction thereof.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

682.

Every public offense must be prosecuted by indictment or information, except:

1. Where proceedings are had for the removal of civil officers of the state;

2. Offenses arising in the militia when in actual service, and in the land and naval forces in the time of war, or which the state may keep, with the consent of Congress, in time of peace;

3. Misdemeanors and infractions;

4. A felony to which the defendant has pleaded guilty to the complaint before a magistrate, where permitted by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 353.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

683.

The proceeding by which a party charged with a public offense is accused and brought to trial and punishment, is known as a criminal action.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

684.

A criminal action is prosecuted in the name of the people of the State of California, as a party, against the person charged with the offense.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

685.

The party prosecuted in a criminal action is designated in this Code as the defendant.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

686.

In a criminal action the defendant is entitled:

1. To a speedy and public trial.

2. To be allowed counsel as in civil actions, or to appear and defend in person and with counsel, except that in a capital case he shall be represented in court by counsel at all stages of the preliminary and trial proceedings.

3. To produce witnesses on his behalf and to be confronted with the witnesses against him, in the presence of the court, except that:

(a) Hearsay evidence may be admitted to the extent that it is otherwise admissible in a criminal action under the law of this state.

(b) The deposition of a witness taken in the action may be read to the extent that it is otherwise admissible under the law of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1800.)
-------------------------------------------

686.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the defendant in a capital case shall be represented in court by counsel at all stages of the preliminary and trial proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1800.)
-------------------------------------------

686.2.

(a) The court may, after holding a hearing and making the findings set forth in subdivision (b), order the removal of any spectator who is intimidating a witness.

(b) The court may order the removal of a spectator only if it finds all of the following by clear and convincing evidence:

(1) The spectator to be removed is actually engaging in intimidation of the witness.

(2) The witness will not be able to give full, free, and complete testimony unless the spectator is removed.

(3) Removal of the spectator is the only reasonable means of ensuring that the witness may give full, free, and complete testimony.

(c) Subdivision (a) shall not be used as a means of excluding the press or a defendant from attendance at any portion of a criminal proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 785, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

686.5.

In any case in which a person is arrested and released without trial or in which a person is arrested, tried, and acquitted, if such person is indigent and is released or acquitted at a place to which he has been transported by the arresting agency and which is more than 25 airline miles from the place of his arrest, the arresting agency shall, at his request, return or provide for return of such person to the place of his arrest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1096.)
-------------------------------------------

687.

No person can be subjected to a second prosecution for a public offense for which he has once been prosecuted and convicted or acquitted.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

688.

No person charged with a public offense may be subjected, before conviction, to any more restraint than is necessary for his detention to answer the charge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

688.5.

(a) A city, county, or city and county, including an attorney acting on behalf of a city, county, or city and county, shall not charge a defendant for the costs of investigation, prosecution, or appeal in a criminal case, including, but not limited to, a criminal violation of a local ordinance. This prohibition shall not apply in any civil action or civil proceeding.

(b) This section shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) A violation of Section 186.8, 186.11, or 670.

(2) Costs ordered by a court pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 17062 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) A violation of Section 1871.4 of the Insurance Code.

(4) A violation of Section 3700.5 of the Labor Code.

(5) A violation of Section 19542.3, 19701, 19701.5, 19705, 19706, 19720, 19721, 30165.1, 30482, 38800, 46701, 46702, 46704, or 46705 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(6) A violation of Section 2126 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(7) A violation of any other provision of state law where recovery of the costs of investigation, prosecution, or appeal in a criminal case is specifically authorized by statute or ordered by a court. This paragraph does not apply to a local ordinance.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be
 interpreted to affect the authority of a probation department to assess and collect fees or other charges authorized by statute.

(d) For the purposes of this section, the term “costs” means the salary, fees, and hourly rate paid to attorneys, law enforcement, and inspectors for hours spent either investigating or enforcing the charged crime. Costs shall not include the cost, including oversight, to remediate, abate, restore, or otherwise clean-up harms caused by criminal conduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 264, Sec. 1.   (AB 2495)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

689.

No person can be convicted of a public offense unless by verdict of a jury, accepted and recorded by the court, by a finding of the court in a case where a jury has been waived, or by a plea of guilty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1674.)
-------------------------------------------

690.

The provisions of Part 2 (commencing with Section 681) shall apply to all criminal actions and proceedings in all courts, except where jurisdictional limitations or the nature of specific provisions prevent, or special provision is made for particular courts or proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 46.)
-------------------------------------------

690.5.

(a) Subdivisions (a) and (e) of Section 1010.6 of the Code of Civil Procedure, pertaining to the permissive filing and service of documents, are applicable to criminal actions, except as otherwise provided in
 Section 959.1 or any other provision of this code.

(b) The Judicial Council shall adopt uniform rules for the electronic filing and service of documents in criminal cases in the trial courts of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 215, Sec. 5.   (AB 2961)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

691.

The following words have in Part 2 (commencing with Section 681) the signification attached to them in this section, unless it is otherwise apparent from the context:

(a) The words “competent court” when used with reference to the jurisdiction over any public offense, mean any court the subject matter jurisdiction of which includes the offense so mentioned.

(b) The words “jurisdictional territory” when used with reference to a court, mean the city and county, county, city, township, or other limited territory over which the criminal jurisdiction of the court extends, as provided by law, and in case of a superior court mean the county in which the court sits.

(c) The words “accusatory pleading” include an indictment, an information, an accusation, and a complaint.

(d) The words “prosecuting attorney” include any attorney, whether designated as district attorney, city attorney, city prosecutor, prosecuting attorney, or by any other title, having by law the right or duty to prosecute, on behalf of the people, any charge of a public offense.

(e) The word “county” includes county, city and county, and city.

(f) “Felony case” means a criminal action in which a felony is charged and includes a criminal action in which a misdemeanor or infraction is charged in conjunction with a felony.

(g) “Misdemeanor or infraction case” means a criminal action in which a misdemeanor or infraction is charged and does not include a criminal action in which a felony is charged in conjunction with a misdemeanor or infraction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 354.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 1. OF THE PREVENTION OF PUBLIC OFFENSES [692. - 727.]



  CHAPTER 1. Of Lawful Resistance [692. - 694.]

692.

Lawful resistance to the commission of a public offense may be made:

1. By the party about to be injured;

2. By other parties.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

693.

Resistance sufficient to prevent the offense may be made by the party about to be injured:

1. To prevent an offense against his person, or his family, or some member thereof.

2. To prevent an illegal attempt by force to take or injure property in his lawful possession.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

694.

Any other person, in aid or defense of the person about to be injured, may make resistance sufficient to prevent the offense.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Of the Intervention of the Officers of Justice [697. - 698.]

697.

Public offenses may be prevented by the intervention of the officers of justice:

1. By requiring security to keep the peace;

2. By forming a police in cities and towns, and by requiring their attendance in exposed places;

3. By suppressing riots.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

698.

When the officers of justice are authorized to act in the prevention of public offenses, other persons, who, by their command, act in their aid, are justified in so doing.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Security to Keep the Peace [701. - 714.]

701.

An information may be laid before any of the magistrates mentioned in Section 808, that a person has threatened to commit an offense against the person or property of another.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

701.5.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), no peace officer or agent of a peace officer shall use a person who is 12 years of age or younger as a minor informant.

(b) No peace officer or agent of a peace officer shall use a person under the age of 18 years as a minor informant, except as authorized pursuant to the Stop Tobacco Access to Kids Enforcement Act (Division 8.5 (commencing with Section 22950) of the Business and Professions Code) for the purposes of that act, unless the peace officer or agent of a peace officer has obtained an order from the court authorizing the minor’s cooperation.

(c) Prior to issuing any order pursuant to subdivision (b), the court shall find, after consideration of (1) the age and maturity of the minor, (2) the gravity of the minor’s alleged offense, (3) the safety of the public, and (4) the interests of justice, that the agreement to act as a minor informant is voluntary and is being entered into knowingly and intelligently.

(d) Prior to the court making the finding required in subdivision (c), all of the following conditions shall be satisfied:

(1) The court has found probable cause that the minor committed the alleged offense. The finding of probable cause shall only be for the purpose of issuing the order pursuant to subdivision (b), and shall not prejudice the minor in any future proceedings.

(2) The court has advised the minor of the mandatory minimum and maximum sentence for the alleged offense.

(3) The court has disclosed the benefit the minor may obtain by cooperating with the peace officer or agent of a peace officer.

(4) The minor’s parent or guardian has consented to the agreement by the minor unless the parent or guardian is a suspect in the criminal investigation.

(e) For purposes of this section, “minor informant” means a minor who participates, on behalf of a law enforcement agency, in a prearranged transaction or series of prearranged transactions with direct face-to-face contact with any party, when the minor’s participation in the transaction is for the purpose of obtaining or attempting to obtain evidence of illegal activity by a third party and where the minor is participating in the transaction for the purpose of reducing or dismissing a pending juvenile petition against the minor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 833, Sec. 1.   Effective September 25, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

702.

When the information is laid before such magistrate he must examine on oath the informer, and any witness he may produce, and must take their depositions in writing, and cause them to be subscribed by the parties making them.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

703.

If it appears from the depositions that there is just reason to fear the commission of the offense threatened, by the person so informed against, the magistrate must issue a warrant, directed generally to the sheriff of the county, or any marshal, or policeman in the state, reciting the substance of the information, and commanding the officer forthwith to arrest the person informed of and bring him or her before the magistrate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 113.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

704.

When the person informed against is brought before the magistrate, if the charge be controverted, the magistrate shall take testimony in relation thereto. The evidence shall be reduced to writing and subscribed by the witnesses. The magistrate may, in his or her discretion, order the testimony and proceedings to be taken down in shorthand, and for that purpose he or she may appoint a shorthand reporter. The deposition or testimony of the witnesses shall be authenticated in the form prescribed in Section 869.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 48.)
-------------------------------------------

705.

If it appears that there is no just reason to fear the commission of the offense alleged to have been threatened, the person complained of must be discharged.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

706.

If, however, there is just reason to fear the commission of the offense, the person complained of may be required to enter into an undertaking in such sum, not exceeding five thousand dollars, as the magistrate may direct, to keep the peace towards the people of this state, and particularly towards the informer. The undertaking is valid and binding for six months, and may, upon the renewal of the information, be extended for a longer period, or a new undertaking may be required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 315.)
-------------------------------------------

707.

If the undertaking required by the last section is given, the party informed of must be discharged. If he does not give it, the magistrate must commit him to prison, specifying in the warrant the requirement to give security, the amount thereof, and the omission to give the same.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

708.

If the person complained of is committed for not giving the undertaking required, he may be discharged by any magistrate, upon giving the same.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

709.

The undertaking must be filed by the magistrate in the office of the Clerk of the county.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

710.

A person who, in the presence of a Court or magistrate, assaults or threatens to assault another, or to commit an offense against his person or property, or who contends with another with angry words, may be ordered by the Court or magistrate to give security, as in this Chapter provided, and if he refuse to do so, may be committed as provided in Section 707.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

711.

Upon the conviction of the person informed against of a breach of the peace, the undertaking is broken.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

712.

Upon the District Attorney’s producing evidence of such conviction to the Superior Court of the county, the Court must order the undertaking to be prosecuted, and the District Attorney must thereupon commence an action upon it in the name of the people of this State.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1880, Ch. 56.)
-------------------------------------------

713.

In the action the offense stated in the record of conviction must be alleged as a breach of the undertaking, and such record is conclusive evidence of the breach.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

714.

Security to keep the peace, or be of good behavior, cannot be required except as prescribed in this Chapter.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Suppression of Riots [723. - 727.]

723.

When a sheriff or other public officer authorized to execute process finds, or has reason to apprehend, that resistance will be made to the execution of the process, the officer may command as many able-bodied inhabitants of the officer’s county as he or she may think proper to assist in overcoming the resistance and, if necessary, in seizing, arresting, and confining the persons resisting, and their aiders and abettors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 160, Sec. 128.)
-------------------------------------------

724.

The officer must certify to the Court from which the process issued the names of the persons resisting, and their aiders and abettors, to the end that they may be proceeded against for their contempt of Court.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

726.

Where any number of persons, whether armed or not, are unlawfully or riotously assembled, the sheriff of the county and his or her deputies, the officials governing the town or city, or any of them, must go among the persons assembled, or as near to them as possible, and command them, in the name of the people of the state, immediately to disperse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 355.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

727.

If the persons assembled do not immediately disperse, such magistrates and officers must arrest them, and to that end may command the aid of all persons present or within the county.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 2. MODE OF PROSECUTION [737. - 745.]

737.

All felonies shall be prosecuted by indictment or information, except as provided in Section 859a. A proceeding pursuant to Section 3060 of the Government Code shall be prosecuted by accusation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 356.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

738.

Before an information is filed there must be a preliminary examination of the case against the defendant and an order holding him to answer made under Section 872. The proceeding for a preliminary examination must be commenced by written complaint, as provided elsewhere in this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1674.)
-------------------------------------------

739.

When a defendant has been examined and committed, as provided in Section 872, it shall be the duty of the district attorney of the county in which the offense is triable to file in the superior court of that county within 15 days after the commitment, an information against the defendant which may charge the defendant with either the offense or offenses named in the order of commitment or any offense or offenses shown by the evidence taken before the magistrate to have been committed. The information shall be in the name of the people of the State of California and subscribed by the district attorney.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1674.)
-------------------------------------------

740.

Except as otherwise provided by law, all misdemeanors and infractions must be prosecuted by written complaint under oath subscribed by the complainant. Such complaint may be verified on information and belief.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 357.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

741.

(a) Beginning January 1, 2024, the Department of Justice shall develop, issue, and publish “Race-Blind Charging” guidelines for a process whereby all prosecution agencies, for purposes of this section defined as agencies, or branches of agencies, that prosecute criminal violations of the law as felonies or misdemeanors, shall implement a process by which an initial review of a case for potential charging is performed based on information, including police reports and criminal histories from the Department of Justice, from which direct means of identifying the
 race of the suspect, victim, or witness have been removed or redacted. 

(b) Following the department’s guidelines, prosecution agencies shall independently develop and execute versions of this redaction and review process with the following general criteria: 

(1) Beginning January 1, 2025, cases received from law enforcement agencies and suspect criminal history documentation shall be redacted, by the receiving prosecution agency, in order to be used for a race-blind initial charging evaluation, which shall precede the ordinary charging evaluation. This redaction may occur in a separate version of the documents and
 may be done mechanically, by hand performed by personnel not associated with the charging of the case, or by automation with the use of computer programming, so long as the method used reasonably ensures correct redaction. The redaction may be applied to the entire report or to only the “narrative” portion of the report so long as the portion submitted for initial review is sufficient to perform that review and the unredacted portions are not part of the initial charging evaluation.

(2) The initial charging evaluation based on redacted information, including redacted reports, criminal histories, and narratives, shall determine whether the case should be charged or not be charged. Individual charges shall not be determined at this initial charging evaluation stage. Other evidence may be considered as part of this initial charging evaluation so
 long as the other evidence does not reveal redacted facts. The initial charging evaluation shall be performed by a prosecutor who does not have knowledge of the redacted facts for that case.

(3) After completion of a race-blind initial charging evaluation, the case shall proceed to a second, complete review for charging using unredacted reports and all available evidence in which the most applicable individual charges and enhancements may be considered and charged in a criminal complaint, or the case may be submitted to a grand jury.

(4) (A) Each of the following circumstances shall be documented as part of the case record:

(i) The initial charging evaluation determined that the case not be
 charged and the second review determined that a charge shall be filed.

(ii) The initial charging evaluation determined that the case shall be charged and the second review determined that no charge be filed.

(B) The explanation for the charging decision change shall be documented as part of the case record.

(C) The documented change between the result of the initial charging evaluation and the second review, as well as the explanation for the change, shall be disclosed, upon request, after sentencing in the case or dismissal of
 all charges comprising the case, subject to Section 1054.6 or any other applicable law.

(5) If a prosecution agency was unable to put a case through a race-blind initial charging evaluation, the reason for that inability shall be documented and retained by the agency. This documentation shall be made available by the agency upon request.

(6) The county shall collect the data resulting from the race-blind initial charging evaluation process and make the data available for research purposes.

(c) Each prosecution agency may remove or exclude certain classes of crimes or factual circumstances from a race-blind initial charging evaluation. This list of exclusions and the reasons for exclusion shall be available upon request to
 the Department of Justice and members of the public. Due to the increased reliance
 on victim or witness credibility, the availability of additional defenses, the increased reliance on forensics for the charging decision, or the relevance of racial animus to the charging decision, each of the following crimes may be excluded from a race-blind initial charging evaluation process:

(1) Homicides.

(2) Hate crimes.

(3) Charges arising from a physical confrontation where that confrontation is captured in video as evidence.

(4) Domestic violence and sex crimes.

(5) Gang crimes.

(6) Cases alleging either sexual
 assault or physical abuse or neglect where the charging decision relies upon either a forensic interview of a child or interviews of multiple victims or multiple defendants.
